[Diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infections using isotope-selective non dispersive infrared spectrometry with 13C-urea breath test].The 13C-Urea Breath Test (13C-UBT) is a non-invasive simple and reliable test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection. Widespread use of the test is limited by the high cost of isotope-ratio mass-spectrometry that is required for analysis of the breath samples. The aim of our study was: 1) evaluate the accuracy of a simple optical method called isotope-selective non-dispersive infrared spectrometry (NDIRS), which is designed to measure 13CO2/12CO2 ratio; 2) evaluate the possibility to reduce timing of breath samples collection after 13C-urea ingestion.13C-UBT and gastroscopy were performed in one hundred patients (mean age: 51 years; range: 18-81 years; M/F: 48/52) after overnight fasting. None had taken antibiotics, proton pump inhibitor or bismuth-containing preparations for at least four weeks. Two biopsies from the antrum and two from the body of the stomach were obtained from each patient to investigate the Helicobacter pylori status. Breath samples were collected from each patient in aluminised plastic bags with a volume of 1200 ml, before and 10, 20 and 30 minutes after ingestion of 75 mg 13C-urea dissolved in 200 ml of orange juice. A value of "Delta-Over-Baseline" higher than 4@1000 was considered positive. The operators of each device were unaware of Helicobacter pylori status.54/55 patients resulted positive on 13C-UBT in respect of immunohistochemistry. 44/45 patients resulted negative on 13C-UBT in respect of immunohistochemistry. The sensibility resulted 98.1%, specificity 97.7%. No significant difference between sample collection at 10, 20 or 30 minutes after ingestion of 13C-urea was found (Chi square: p: n.s.).This study shows that the diagnostic accuracy of infrared spectroscopy is excellent and comparable with data of other authors about conventional isotope-ratio mass spectrometry. No significant difference between sample collection at 10, 20 or 30 minutes after ingestion of 13C-urea was found (Chi square: p: n.s.). Timing of sample collection may be reduced from 30 to 10 minutes with the purpose of cut down more the costs for this test.Helicobacter pylori FliD protein is a highly sensitive and specific marker for serologic diagnosis of H. pylori infection.Screening for H. pylori in large populations continues to be a challenging task, since available tests have limited sensitivity and specificity, which, in population-based approaches, leads to significant numbers of false positive and false negative results. Various H. pylori proteins associated with virulence are highly immunogenic and therefore candidates to detect the infection. There are currently no defined markers that are recognized in all H. pylori infected patients and that do not show cross-reactivity with other bacterial proteins. We identified the H. pylori "hook-associated protein 2 homologue", FliD (UniProtKB/Swiss-Prot: P96786.4) as a novel marker of infection for serological analysis. The H. pylori FliD protein is an essential element in the assembly of the functional flagella. However, this virulence factor has not yet been tested as a diagnostic marker in serology. For this purpose FliD was recombinantly expressed in E. coli, purified by affinity chromatography and gel filtration and used to coat ELISA plates or immobilized on nitrocellulose stripes. To evaluate its antigenicity we screened a defined panel of patient sera. The recombinant H. pylori FliD protein reacted with a high percentage of human sera. Among 318 samples reported positive by histology, 310 (97.4%) were tested positive by FliD Line assay, and 165 out of 170 samples were tested positive by ELISA (97%). We could also reconfirm 297 out of 300 (99%) negative sera by Line assay and 73 from 76 (96%) by ELISA. Taken together, application of FliD in serological diagnosis of H. pylori infection presents a high specificity of up to 99% and a sensitivity of up to 97%. This makes especially the FliD ELISA a simple, cost effective and highly efficient tool to detect H. pylori infection in developing countries where prevalence is high and other screening methods are either not available or are unaffordable. Validation of [13C]urea breath test for Helicobacter pylori using a simple gas chromatograph-mass selective detector.Isotope ratio mass spectrometry (IRMS) is the accepted method for accurately measuring the 13CO2:12CO2 ratio in the non-invasive and non-radioactive [13C]urea breath test (13C-UBT) for Helicobactor pylori. The IRMS instrument, an expensive and highly specialized analyser, is rarely available. The objective of this project was to modify and validate the use of a simple bench-top gas chromatograph-mass selective detector (GC-MSD) for 13C-UBT.Breath samples from 71 patients were taken at baseline and 30 min after ingestion of 100 mg [13C]urea. The breath samples were analysed using GC-MSD in the selected ion monitoring mode. The reference 13CO2:12CO2 ratio was from NBS19 obtained from the US National Institute of Standards and Technology. 13CO2:12CO2 ratios of the breath samples were determined. Excess delta per thousand (per mil, delta/thousand) of the 30 min sample over the baseline (deltadelta/thousand) of > or = 6deltadelta/thousand was considered H. pylori positive. Results from 13C-UBT and histology determined blind to each other were compared.The coefficient of variation of the reference 13CO2:12CO2 ratio was 0.06%. Using histology as the 'gold standard', the sensitivity (97.9%) and specificity (95.8%) of the GC-MSD 13C-UBT were comparable to those of other methods of H. pylori diagnosis.A gas chromatograph coupled to a mass selective detector that is available in many analytical and biomedical laboratories can be used for the 13C-UBT. This method will increase the availability and reduce the cost of this non-invasive, non-radioactive diagnostic test.A rapid lateral flow stool antigen immunoassay and (14)C-urea breath test for the diagnosis and eradication of Helicobacter pylori infection in children.Our aim was to evaluate diagnostic accuracy of rapid immunochromatographic stool antigen test (Rapid HpSA; LINEAR Chemical, Barcelona, Spain) and a practical low-dose (14)C urea breath test (UBT) (Heliprobetrade mark) test before and after eradication therapy. One hundred nine children with abdominal symptoms (age range, 5-17 years; mean, 12.1) underwent endoscopy, (14)C-UBT, and Rapid HpSA. Patients were defined as Hp infected when histology was positive for Hp. Forty children (36.6%) were Hp infected. The sensitivity of Rapid HpSA and (14)C-UBT was 65% and 92.5% (P = 0.0003), respectively; the specificity of Rapid HpSA and (14)C-UBT was 92.3% and 85.5% (P = 0.180), respectively. After eradication therapy endoscopy, (14)C-UBT and Rapid HpSA were repeated. The eradication rate was 70.5%. After eradication, the sensitivity of Rapid HpSA and (14)C-UBT was 60% and 100%, respectively; the specificity of Rapid HpSA and (14)C-UBT was 100%. (14)C-UBT was more reliable than the Rapid HpSA test for the diagnosis and for confirming eradication of Hp infection.[Usefulness of the 14C-urea marked test in the detection of Helicobacter pylori in patients with dyspepsia].This study was undertaken to evaluate the usefulness of the urea test (UT) in the detection of Helicobacter pylori (HP) in dyspeptic patients. The UT was done in 105 patients with dyspepsia who underwent endoscopy and biopsy. Hematoxylin-eosin and Warthin Starry tissue stains were performed for HP detection, and the resulting microscopic findings were considered as the gold standard. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the UT were of 95%, 63%, 85% and 83% when compared to the hematoxylin-eosin stain-related findings, and 99%, 79%, 93% and 96% when compared to those related to the Warthin Starry stain. We conclude that the UT is a simple, non-invasive and useful diagnostic alternative to detect HP in patients with dyspepsia.Comparison of rapid serological tests (FlexSure HP and QuickVue) with conventional ELISA for detection of Helicobacter pylori infection.There is a need for accurate and rapid tests for Helicobacter pylori infection especially since the recent National Institutes of Health Consensus Development Conference on H. pylori in peptic ulcer disease charged the medical community with treating H. pylori infection in all patients with H. pylori and ulcer disease.We prospectively compared a simple, rapid serological test (FlexSure HP, SmithKline Diagnostics) for the detection of serum IgG antibodies against H. pylori with another rapid test (QuickVue, Quidel) and two enzyme immunoassays (HM-CAP, Enteric Products, and PyloriStat, BioWhittaker). Serum samples from 551 individuals including both symptomatic patients (196) and asymptomatic volunteers (355) were tested for the presence of IgG antibodies against H. pylori. The presence or absence of active H. pylori infections was determined using the [13C]-urea breath test.All of the serological tests performed well. FlexSure HP had calculated sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of 94.4, 87.6, and 91.1%, respectively, relative to the urea breath test. In 49 of the 551 samples, the urea breath test and FlexSure HP did not agree. Those samples were tested with HM-CAP immunoassay to confirm presence or absence of IgG antibodies against H. pylori. After the resolution of the discordant results, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of FlexSure HP were 96.0, 95.1, and 95.6%, respectively, and were comparable to HM-CAP and PyloriStat. FlexSure HP was compared with histology or culture in 75 cases, and the accuracy was 100%. FlexSure HP and QuickVue were compared using 200 serum samples. FlexSure HP was more specific (88.7 vs 79.4%) and accurate (91 vs 84%) than QuickVue (p < 0.05 for both), relative to the urea breath test with discordant samples unresolved. FlexSure HP was also simpler to use, easier to interpret, and faster than QuickVue. FlexSure HP required no sample dilution, one reagent, four steps, and 5 min to complete.FlexSure HP is an excellent option for in-office tests for the physician who desires immediate results or for small laboratories that do not have the volume of H. pylori testing to justify ELISA test formats.Evaluation of the novel Helicobacter pylori ClariRes real-time PCR assay for detection and clarithromycin susceptibility testing of H. pylori in stool specimens from symptomatic children.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the Helicobacter pylori ClariRes assay (Ingenetix, Vienna, Austria) for the detection of H. pylori infection and the simultaneous clarithromycin susceptibility testing of the H. pylori isolates in stool samples from 100 symptomatic children. The results obtained by this novel biprobe real-time PCR method were directly compared with the results obtained from histological examination of gastric biopsy specimens, culturing, the [13C]urea breath test, and a monoclonal antibody-based stool antigen enzyme immunoassay (EIA). Fecal specimens from all 54 children who were shown to be noninfected by "gold standard" tests gave true-negative PCR results (specificity, 100%). Of the remaining 46 individuals with a positive H. pylori status, 29 were found to be positive by real-time PCR (sensitivity, 63%). For these 29 cases, the H. pylori ClariRes assay confirmed all results from phenotypic clarithromycin susceptibility testing by Etest. In summary, this investigation demonstrates that detection of Helicobacter DNA in stool samples by real-time PCR is a difficult task and that this method cannot replace the stool antigen EIA (sensitivity, 95.7%) for the accurate diagnosis of H. pylori infection in children.Five micro-curie urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection: evaluation in a South-East Asian population.Helicobacter pylori is an important pathogen responsible for significant morbidity and mortality. Its prevalence varies widely in different geographical locations and is especially high in parts of Asia.A double-blind study was carried out to evaluate the use of the 5 microCi (185 KBq) [14C]-urea breath test ([14C]-UBT) in a South-East Asian population by validating its diagnostic accuracy against histology and the CLO test.The sensitivity and specificity of the [14C]-UBT was 100% when compared against the CLO test. When histology was used as the 'gold standard', the sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 97.2%, respectively. There was no overlap or indeterminate values between positive and negative results on the [14C]-UBT.Among South-East Asian populations where the prevalence of H. pylori infection is high, the high sensitivity of the 5 microCi [14C]-UBT makes it a very important test in the detection of H. pylori.Comparison of the C14 urea breath test and histopathology in the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori in the elderly.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of C[14] urea breath test with histopathological findings in biopsies obtained through endoscopy.In this cross-sectional study, conducted at the Medical Faculty Ankara University, Ankara, Turkey between January and October 2009, 100 patients aged 65 and above who fulfilled the criteria for inclusion were enrolled. Oesophago-gastroduodenoscopy was carried out on the patients after eight hours of fasting, using a Fujinon endoscope, by the same expert. C14 urea breath tests were carried out on all patients with a capsule containing 37 kBq(1micro Ci) C14 urea/citric acid. Evaluation of all data was carried out using SPSS 11.5. Categorical variables were compared through Pearson Chi squared or Fisher's exact test. P < 0.005 was taken as statistically significant.The average age of the patients was 71 +/- 5 years; 43 (43%) were male; and 57 (57%) were female. Helicobacter pylori positivity was found to be 35 (35%) in histopathological evaluation, and 36 (36%) in the C14 urea breath test. Of the 35 patients, 32 (91.4%) were found to be positive by the C14 urea breath test also. Of the 65 patients who were found to be negative on histopathology, 61 (93.8%) were also found to be Hp negative by the C14 urea breath test, and 4 (6.2%) were evaluated as false positive. A statistically significant correlation (p < 0.001) was found between histopathological and C14 urea breath test results. Compared with histopathology, the sensitivity of the urea breath test was 91.4%, and its specificity was 93.8%. A statistically significant (p < 0.001) relationship was found between histopathological results and the results of the C14 urea breath test.The sensitivity and specificity of the C[14] urea breath test in the group of elderly patients selected was high. The C14 urea breath test can be considered in the elderly group for diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection.Comparison of Helicobacter pylori antibody detection in stool with other diagnostic tests for infection.For detection of Helicobacter pylori, bacterial culture and histopathological examination are invasive in nature, whereas the fast urease test and urea breath test are non-invasive and indirect methods of detection. Stool antibody tests and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to detect genomic DNA are serological methods, which are preferred to invasive examinations. Our aim was to assess diagnostic specifity and sensitivity of stool antibody tests, with histopathological examination as the golden standard and to compare results with fast urease test findings. Biopsy samples of patients in the study were evaluated as examples of invasive methods, and also stool antibody screening were made (HpSA). When urease and HpSA test results were compared with histopathological results, sensitivity and specificity of urease test were 62.2% and 100%, respectively, and 68.9% and 100% for the HpSA test. General accuracy was 80% and 81%, respectively , positive predictive value 100% with each and negative predictive values 66.1% and 67.2% . The differences were not statistically significant, and the confidence intervals were approximately in the same range. Thus results obtained with biopsy urease and HpSA tests were generally similar to those obtained by histopathological examination. A review of national and international literature showed similar findings.Evaluation of a new rapid immunoassay for the detection of Helicobacter pylori in faeces: a prospective pilot study.Detection of Helicobacter pylori antigen in faeces is a valid method to diagnose H. pylori infection. Presently available stool tests are performed in the laboratory, and diagnostic report is delayed.To evaluate a new rapid stool test in a pre-treatment setting and to compare it with a validated laboratory stool test.A total of 105 patients underwent gastroscopy with brush cytology, and biopsies for histology and rapid urease test, to assess H. pylori presence. Helicobacter pylori-status was considered positive if at least two tests were positive; negative if all tests were negative; indeterminate if one test was positive and two negative. Stool specimens were tested using either a rapid immunoassay kit (ImmunoCard STAT) or a laboratory enzyme immunoassay kit (Hp StAR).Sixty patients were infected with H. pylori, 44 non-infected, one indeterminate. The sensitivity and specificity of ImmunoCard STAT were 85 and 93%; those of Hp StAR were 88 and 100% (not significant).ImmunoCard STAT seems a reliable method for detecting H. pylori in untreated patients. It could replace laboratory stool tests, as it is easy and can be performed quickly. These characteristics might be a breakthrough for diagnosing H. pylori in the doctor's office.[Study of urease test or breath test (BT) and correlation with gastric biopsy to detect helicobacter pylori (Hp) in dyspeptic patients at "Hospital Nacional Cayetano Heredia hospital" (HNCH)--Lima].To establish the utility of the IPEN ureasa test or breath test with C14, in the detection of Helicobacter pylori infection in dyspeptic patients at the HNCH.31 dyspeptic patients that attended the outpatient GI clinic during September 2004 were included. All of them had an upper endoscopy, gastric biopsies, and a Breath Test with C14, done at the IPEN (Peruvian Institute of Nuclear Energy). The diagnosis of HP infection was based on the histopathology report.Of the 31 Breath Test, one was a false negative and in 30 there was a good correlation with the biopsies results, 23 demonstrated the HP infection and in 7 this was not present.The IPEN Breath Test showed in this study a sensibility of 96.6% and a specificity of 100%, demonstrating that is a very useful diagnostic tool for HP infection.Evaluation of a new enzyme immunoassay for the detection of Helicobacter pylori in stool specimens.H. pylori infects the gastric mucosa and causes many digestive disorders such as peptic ulcer, chronic gastritis and gastric cancer. H. pylori infection relates neither to functional health status, nor to intensity of dyspepsia. There is evidence that in most patients with H. pylori positive functional dyspepsia do not improve with eradication of the organism.This study evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of HpSA by determining the sensitivity and specificity of the stool antigen test in predicting successful eradication during and after anti microbial therapy. The work was conducted on patients who underwent upper gastrointestinal endoscopy at Al-Azhar University hospitals. Fifty patients (34 male & 16 female) with dyspepsia were selected, the exclusion criteria included use of antibiotics and proton pump inhibitors up to one month before the study. All cases were submitted to, full history, general and local examination and upper gastrointestinal endoscopy. Biopsies were taken from the antrum and body of the stomach for rapid urease test and histopathology. Stool samples were taken to detect H. pylori stool antigen. Positive patients received eradication treatment for one month and H. pylori status was re-determined by rapid urease test, histological examination and HpSA test one month later. H. pylori was detected by rapid urease test in 29 (58%) dyspeptic patient by histology in 26(52%) dyspeptic patient, while H. pylori was detected by HpSA immunoassay in 16 (32%) dyspeptic patient. The sensitivity and specificity of HpSA were 57.7% and 95.8% respectively. After successful eradication of H. pylori, reassessment by rapid urease test and histology revealed curative rate of 86.2% and 84.6% respectively, while HpSA immunoassay revealed curative rate 75%. Based on these results, the HpSA immunoassay gave sensitivity (75%) and specificity (100%). The H. pylori stool test represents an accurate and novel non-invasive concept for diagnosis of infection and can be used for daily routine in clinical practice. HpSA is a promising non-invasive test for diagnosis of H. pylori infection but may be hampered by low patient acceptability. So, HpSA is a valuable test in the pre-and post eradication assessment of infection. HpSA can be profitably employed in the primary diagnosis of H. pylori infection. This non invasive test could be very useful in investigating dyspeptic young patients. Also, it could be used profitably in epidemiological studies to determine the prevalence of H. pylori infection in the asymptomatic subjects in different communities.The 13carbon urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection in subjects with atrophic gastritis: evaluation in a primary care setting.(13)Carbon urea breath testing is reliable to detect current infection with Helicobacter pylori but has been reported to be of limited value in selected patients with atrophic body gastritis or acid-lowering medication.To evaluate the accuracy of (13)carbon urea breath testing for H. pylori detection in 20 asymptomatic patients with histologically confirmed atrophic body gastritis in a primary care setting.(13)Carbon urea breath testing and serology were compared with H. pylori culture of a corpus biopsy as reference test.All tests were in agreement in 12 patients, being all positive in six and all negative in six. One patient was positive for serology and culture but negative for (13)carbon urea breath testing, five patients had only positive serology and two patients had only positive (13)carbon urea breath testing. (13)Carbon urea breath testing showed an accuracy with culture of 85% and anti-H. pylori serology with culture of 75%. (13)Carbon urea breath testing carried out in patients with positive serology showed an accuracy of 92%. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis of (13)carbon urea breath testing shows optimal discrimination at the prescribed cut-off value.(13)Carbon urea breath testing can be used as diagnostic H. pylori test in asymptomatic patients with atrophic body gastritis, preferably in addition to serology, to select subjects for anti-H. pylori therapy.Is the remarkable contradiction between histology and 14C urea breath test in the detection of Helicobacter pylori due to false-negative histology or false-positive 14C urea breath test?We assessed the diagnostic value of the 14C urea breath test (UBT) in the detection of Helicobacter pylori compared with histology and the rapid urease test (RUT). The study included 68 patients (22 men and 46 women) with dyspeptic symptoms. H. pylori status was evaluated by 14C UBT, RUT and histology. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and diagnostic accuracy were determined for 14C UBT and for RUT. Histology revealed dense yeast-like micro-organisms in the biopsy specimens in all patients with false-positive results by 14C UBT (n = 8), a significantly higher proportion than in patients with negative 14C UBT (five of 31). The low specificity of the H. pylori 14C UBT should not be neglected by accepting histology results as false-negative. Gastric mucosal colonization by yeast-like micro-organisms with urease activity can account for the high frequency of false-positive results for 14C UBT.Diagnostic accuracy of (13)C-urea breath test in the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection in patients with partial gastric resection due to peptic ulcer disease: a prospective multicenter study.We investigated the diagnostic properties of the (13)C-urea breath test ((13)C-UBT) prospectively. These are well validated in nonresected patients before and after treatment of Helicobacter pylori infection but not in patients with partial gastric resection due to peptic ulcer disease.Hospitalized patients with previous gastric resection and indications for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy were recruited for the study. Biopsy specimens were obtained from the fundus mucosa and the gastric remnant adjacent to the gastroenteric anastomosis for histological examination and rapid urease test (HUT test). Histological slides were evaluated after hematoxylin and eosin and Warthin-Starry dye staining. 200 ml orange juice was given orally after two baseline breath samples had been taken, and 30 min after ingestion of 75 mg (13)C urea two more breath samples were obtained and analyzed by ratio mass spectrometry. The Warthin-Starry dye-stained sample was taken as reference.68 patients (47 male, 21 female, mean age 62 years; 52 Billroth II resection, 17 Billroth I resection) were included in the study. The overall prevalence of histologically proven H. pylori infection was 36.7%. The sensitivity of the (13)C-UBT was 52%, the specificity 93%. The positive predictive value was 81.25%, the negative predictive value 76.9% and the accuracy was 77.9%. The sensitivity of the HUT test reached 60%, and the specificity 97%.The diagnostic accuracy of (13)C-UBT compared with the Warthin-Starry dye staining is low. The breath test, performed in the above-described manner, cannot be recommended as a noninvasive diagnostic tool for diagnosis of H. pylori infection in patients after partial gastrectomy as a result of peptic ulcer disease.Multiple sampling 13C-urea breath test: improvement of diagnosis in postgastrectomy patients.Partial gastrectomy and Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) infection are considered 2 risk factors for gastric cancer development. False negative urea breath test (UBT) results have been described in patients with gastric surgery, due to rapid gastric emptying of urea solution from the stomach. On the other hand, a rapid 10-minute 14C-UBT proved to be highly reliable for diagnosis of H. pylori infection when delaying test meal was omitted. Aim of this study was to improve the diagnostic accuracy of 13C-UBT in patients with gastric resection.UBT was performed in 100 gastrectomised patients with breath collection at 0, 10, 15, 20, 25 and 30 minutes (multi-UBT) after 100 mg 13C urea ingestion and 100 ml of marketed fruit juice. In 28 cases contemporary histological data from biopsy specimens (within 1 month, in absence of treatment) were also available.Multi-UBT was persistently negative or positive in all the samplings in 34% and 25% of cases, respectively. Positivity only at 30 minutes was found in 10% of cases, while 19% of subjects were positive at 15-25 minutes but not at 30 minutes. In 12% of cases the test was positive only at 10 minutes.Multi-UBT offers a not negligible diagnostic improvement over the standard UBT: at least 19%, and up to 31% if positivity at ''10-minute only'' is taken into account. This method can be useful when accurate diagnosis of H. pylori infection is required in gastrectomised patients.Simplified single sample 13Carbon urea breath test for Helicobacter pylori: comparison with histology, culture, and ELISA serology.There is no ideal method for detecting Helicobacter pylori. The 'standard' 13Carbon urea breath test (13C-UBT), which involves collecting eight to 15 breath samples and subsequent costly analysis, was modified by pooling 21 samples of expired breath taken at five minute intervals for 40 minutes into a collecting bag, from which a single 20 ml aliquot was taken and analysed by mass spectrometry. This test was evaluated on 50 patients after routine upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, and results were compared with those from the standard 13C-UBT, bacteriology, ELISA serology, and histology--the latter being taken as the gold standard. H pylori were seen in 34 of 50 (68%) patients (in three it was detected in biopsy specimens from the corpus alone). The modified 13C-UBT was positive (pooled excretion delta 13CO2 greater than 5 per mil) in 31 patients and negative in 19 (three false negative results), specificity was 100% (standard 13C-UBT 94%) and sensitivity 92% (standard 13C-UBT 93%). The modified 13C-UBT had a coefficient of variation within subjects of 3.7%. For the ELISA serology and culture the specificities were both 100%, but the sensitivities were 82% and 68% respectively. The 13C-UBT results correlated with the grade of histological gastritis. The modified 13C-UBT is simpler, cheaper, more reproducible, and provides an easy non-invasive method for the detection of H pylori.A 13C-urea breath test in children with helicobacter pylori infection: assessment of eradication therapy and follow-up after treatment.Our aim was to evaluate the usefulness of the 13C-urea breath test (UBT) for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection, for assessment of the efficacy of eradication therapy, and for post-treatment follow-up in children.Seventy-two patients who underwent endoscopy for symptoms related to the upper gastrointestinal tract were examined by rapid urease test, histology, and culture. The patients were also studied with serology and UBT.Forty-seven of the 72 patients were diagnosed with H. pylori infection, based on the results of biopsy-based tests and serology. As an initial diagnostic test to detect H. pylori infection, the sensitivity of the UBT was 95%, which was comparable with that of histology (94%), rapid urease test (96%), and serology (91%) and was greater than that of culture (79%). The specificity of the UBT was 100%, which was comparable with that of the other four tests. The efficacy of eradication therapy was assessed by biopsy-based tests and the UBT in 24 H. pylori-positive patients. For this purpose, the sensitivities of UBT and histology were 100%, while the sensitivities of culture and the rapid urease test were 88%. The specificity was 100% for all of these tests. Eleven patients were assessed by biopsy-based tests and UBT after more than 6 months of post-treatment follow-up. There were no discordances between the results of the UBT and those of the biopsy-based tests in any of the patients.The UBT may be useful for detecting H. pylori infection in children with upper gastrointestinal tract symptoms, for assessment of the efficacy of eradication therapy, and for the follow-up evaluation of patients after the therapy.The ChemTrak Hp Chek fingerstick whole blood serology test for the detection of Helicobacter pylori infection.To evaluate a new whole blood serology test (Hp Chek; ChemTrak) that detects IgG antibodies to Helicobacter pylori.The study was conducted at 10 sites within the United States. Patients undergoing upper endoscopy for dyspepsia were recruited for enrollment. Those treated for H. pylori infection within a year of endoscopy and those who had regularly used proton pump inhibitors, bismuth compounds, or antibiotics within a month of endoscopy were not eligible. During endoscopy, specimens were obtained from the corpus and antrum for histological examination, which was performed by a single experienced pathologist. The Hp Chek was tested using whole blood and serum. Serum was also tested with a reference enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) at a centralized location. Test characteristics for the Hp Chek and ELISA were calculated using histology as the "gold standard."Two hundred eighty-seven patients (140 women and 147 men; mean age 53 +/- 6 yr) were enrolled. The Hp Chek was easy to perform and yielded results 9 min after inoculation of the test cassette with whole blood or serum. When the Hp Chek used with whole blood was compared with histology as the gold standard, the sensitivity was 88%, specificity 85%, positive predictive value 83%, negative predictive value 90%, and percent agreement 86%. There were no statistically significant differences among the results obtained with the Hp Chek using whole blood, the Hp Chek using serum, or reference ELISA.The Hp Chek whole blood serology test was easy to perform and rapid and yielded performance characteristics comparable to those of a reference ELISA or the Hp Chek used with serum.A new simple immunoassay for detecting Helicobacter pylori infection: antigen in stool specimens.Several diagnostic tests are available for evaluating Helicobacter pylori (Hp) infection: histological examination, culture of gastric biopsy specimens, rapid urease test, urea breath test and serology. A recently marketed direct enzyme immunoassay (HpSA) detects Hp antigen in stool samples. The aim of our study was to evaluate overall diagnostic sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of this new diagnostic test.We included in the study 84 patients (39 males and 45 females; mean age 49.57 years) with dyspeptic symptoms who were examined by upper gastrointestinal endoscopy. Exclusion criteria were previous treatment with proton pump inhibitors, bismuth compounds or antibiotics. During the endoscopic examination biopsies were taken from antrum and corpus for Hp culture and histological examination, and stool specimens were submitted to the laboratory to be stored until the HpSA test. Hp was judged to be present when culture or histology and culture were positive. The (13)C-urea breath test was done only in culture-negative patients in whom either histology or immunoassay or both were positive.Hp was found in 55 patients by both culture and histology. Stool antigen has been detected in 54 of the 55 Hp-positive patients, giving a sensitivity of 98.2% and a negative predictive value of 96.4%. In 2 out of 29 patients HpSA gave a positive result, but the biopsy-based methods were negative, resulting in a low rate of false-positives, with 93.1% specificity and 96.4% positive predictive value; the (13)C-urea breath test confirmed these results as negative.Our results show that this new test is highly sensitive and specific for the detection of Hp infection, and it is satisfactorily reproducible.Determination of the test performance of less costly methods of Helicobacter pylori detection.Since Helicobacter pylori (Hp) has become so important in the management of peptic ulcers, it is imperative that noninvasive and inexpensive methods of diagnosis be available. The objective of this prospective, double-blind study was to determine the performance of the noninvasive 14C-urea breath test and the less expensive hematoxylin-phloxin-saffron (HPS) and Giemsa stains in the detection of this infection. As well, we set out to determine the minimal number of biopsies required to make an accurate diagnosis. Fifty consenting adults referred for gastroscopy underwent antral biopsies for HPS, Giemsa and Steiner silver staining and a 14C-urea breath test. The ability of HPS, Giemsa, and the breath test to differentiate between the presence or absence of Hp infection as defined by the silver stain was assessed using contingency table analysis. Hp was detected in 24 patients with the silver stain. Half of these patients had evidence of ulcer disease, compared to 3 of 26 patients who were negative for Hp on silver stain (p < 0.01). The Hp positive group were more frequently male (62% vs. 31%, p < 0.05) and more often had chronic active gastritis (96% vs. 7.7%, p < 0.001). The sensitivity of the breath test, HPS, and Giemsa stains were 95.8% (95% confidence interval: 79-100%), 75% (53-90%), and 95.8% (79-100%), respectively. Specificity was 100% (87-100%) for all 3 methods of detection. The breath test was also able to discriminate between heavily infected and moderately infected patients as defined by silver stain (p < 0.05), and could be shortened from 30 to 15 min without any loss of accuracy.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Comparison of PCR and other diagnostic techniques for detection of Helicobacter pylori infection in dyspeptic patients.A sensitive and specific PCR-based assay to detect the Helicobacter pylori 16S rRNA gene present in formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded gastric biopsy specimens has been developed. A total of 95 patients with dyspepsia were evaluated for the presence of chronic active gastritis and an infection with H. pylori through the use of diagnostic assays based on biopsy specimens and serology. The "gold standard" for the presence of the bacteria was direct detection in histological sections of biopsy specimens by Giemsa stain. The results obtained with the PCR assay performed on the biopsy specimens (94% sensitivity and 100% specificity) were equivalent to the detection of H. pylori immunoglobulin G antibodies by the commercially available second-generation Cobas Core anti-H. pylori immunoglobulin G enzyme immunoassay (94% sensitivity and 98% specificity) for the diagnosis of H. pylori infection. Urease testing and bacterial culture of the biopsy specimens were inferior (88 and 70% sensitivity and 96% and 98% specificity, respectively). A Western blot (immunoblot) analysis had slightly greater sensitivity (96%), although specificity was reduced to 93%. This research prototype PCR assay was shown to be highly reliable for the detection of infection with H. pylori and the presence of chronic active gastritis in the population studied.Cut-off point, timing and pitfalls of the 13C-urea breath test as measured by infrared spectrometry.The best timing and the best cut-off level of the 13C-urea breath test have not yet been well established.To evaluate the cut-off value and the influence of medication on the 13C-urea breath test as measured by infrared spectrometry.A series of 223 patients, sent for endoscopy performed 13C-urea breath test in fasting conditions with 75 mg of 13C-urea and 20 ml of citric acid. Breath samples were collected before and then 10, 20, 25 and 30 minutes after ingestion. As gold standard, histological examination of gastric biopsies was used. A questionnaire was completed concerning the intake of medication, likely to influence the test, in the 2 months preceding the test. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value at 10, 20, 25 and 30 minutes at different cut-off values (3, 3. 5, 4, 4. 5, 5.0 0/00 DOB] were calculated.A total of 182 patients did not take medication. There was no significant difference between the different cut-off levels at different times. Compared with the group of 41 patients who did take medication, likely to influence the test, the differences were significant (Fisher exact test).There was no significant difference between the different cut-off values. A 10-minute test with a cut-off level between 4 and 5% delta over baseline (sensitivity: 100%, specificity: 95%) is, therefore, proposed. To avoid false negative results due to unknown intake of medication, every patient submitted to the 13C-urea breath test should fill out a questionnaire.The 14C-urea breath-test for the detection of gastric Campylobacter pylori infection.A breath-test has been developed for the detection of gastric infection with Campylobacter pylori. Urea that is labelled with carbon 14 is administered to a fasting patient and the patient's breath is sampled for radioactivity over the following 30 minutes. If C. pylori is present in the patient's stomach, urease activity causes hydrolysis of the urea and the 14C is absorbed as carbon dioxide. This carbon dioxide enters the patient's bicarbonate pool and eventually is excreted in the breath. The results are expressed as a percentage of the administered dose/mmol carbon dioxide x kg body weight. Sixty-three patients who were undergoing endoscopy were studied. The radioactivity in exhaled breath which was sampled within five minutes of 14C-urea administration was attributed to the presence of urease enzyme in mouth organisms and was discounted. The time-radioactivity curves for breath samples from five to 30 minutes after the administration of 14C-urea gave an excellent separation between subjects with negative results of the examination of gastric-biopsy samples and patients with microbiological and histological evidence of infection with C. pylori. The area under the time-radioactivity curve at between five and 30 minutes after the administration of 14C-urea in 24 patients with negative microbiological results was 6.9 +/- 4.4 area units; in 35 of 39 patients with positive microbiological results, this area was greater than 40 area units. Measured against the results of the microbiological examination of gastric-biopsy samples, the sensitivity of breath-testing was 90% and the specificity was 100%. Measured against the results of histological examination for the presence of C. pylori infection, breath-testing had a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 93%. A positive breath-test result also correlated well (P = 0.0001) with the serological antibody test-result. The role of non-invasive tests--enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays and 14C-urea breath-testing--in the management of gastritis and peptic ulcer disease is discussed. We consider that the 14C-urea breath-test has an important role in the noninvasive confirmation of gastric infection with C. pylori and in the follow-up of patients after treatment.Two point analysis 15-minute 14C-urea breath test for diagnosing Helicobacter pylori infection.The value of a two point analysis (double sample) 14C-urea breath test in diagnosing Helicobacter pylori (HP) infection in patients with suspected acid peptic disease has been studied and compared to histology and to a rapid agar plate urease test in 76 patients. Using the histological finding of HP as the gold standard, the 14C-breath test was positive in 59 of the 61 histologically confirmed infected patients and in 3 of the 15 noninfected ones, giving a sensitivity of 97% and specificity of 80%. In 12 patients, a smaller dose of 3 mu Ci 14C-urea was used. The results correlated well with those in whom the higher dose of 10 mu Ci was used. We conclude that a two point 14C-urea breath test with analysis at 5 and 15 min is effective in diagnosing HP infection thus obviating the need for endoscopy and biopsy.A novel line immunoassay based on recombinant virulence factors enables highly specific and sensitive serologic diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection.Helicobacter pylori colonizes half of the world's population, and infection can lead to ulcers, gastric cancer, and mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue (MALT) lymphoma. Serology is the only test applicable for large-scale, population-based screening, but current tests are hampered by a lack of sensitivity and/or specificity. Also, no serologic test allows the differentiation of type I and type II strains, which is important for predicting the clinical outcome. H. pylori virulence factors have been associated with disease, but direct assessment of virulence factors requires invasive methods to obtain gastric biopsy specimens. Our work aimed at the development of a highly sensitive and specific, noninvasive serologic test to detect immune responses to important H. pylori virulence factors. This line immunoassay system (recomLine) is based on recombinant proteins. For this assay, six highly immunogenic virulence factors (CagA, VacA, GroEL, gGT, HcpC, and UreA) were expressed in Escherichia coli, purified, and immobilized to nitrocellulose membranes to detect serological immune responses in patient's sera. For the validation of the line assay, a cohort of 500 patients was screened, of which 290 (58.0%) were H. pylori negative and 210 (42.0%) were positive by histology. The assay showed sensitivity and specificity of 97.6% and 96.2%, respectively, compared to histology. In direct comparison to lysate blotting and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), the recomLine assay had increased discriminatory power. For the assessment of individual risk for gastrointestinal disease, the test must be validated in a larger and defined patient cohort. Taking the data together, the recomLine assay provides a valuable tool for the diagnosis of H. pylori infection. [13C-urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection. Comparison with histology].This study was to evaluate the 13C-urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection compared with pathological data of gastric antrum and fundus endoscopic biopsies.In 95 patients, the results of the 13C-urea breath test were retrospectivally compared with histology (standard and Giemsa staining).Using a ROC curve, the best cut-off value for the 13C-urea breath test was determined at + 3 delta 0/00 of breath isotopic enrichment. Compared with histology, the diagnostic values of the 13C-urea breath test were: sensibility 90.3%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 98.2%, negative predictive value 84%. The false negative results of the breath test (6 out of 95) were obtained in patients with few H. pylori present in antral biopsies, or in patients under omeprazole therapy. The urea breath test was well correlated with the inflammation of the gastric mucosa (P < 0.0001). The isotopic enrichment in breath was well correlated to the number of H. pylori estimated by histological analysis (P < 0.05).The 13C-urea breath test is a non invasive and non radioactive diagnostic tool for H. pylori infection. Its excellent positive predictive value and its good negative predictive value guarantee its usefulness in clinical practice, especially for the control of eradication after anti-H. pylori therapy.Diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori gastritis in children using the 13C urea breath test.The clinical recognition of Helicobacter pylori gastritis in children with recurrent abdominal pain is difficult. We assessed the value of a simplified 13C urea breath test (13C-UBT) in a selected group of children with nocturnal waking and disruptive recurrent abdominal pain who fulfilled criteria for endoscopy. Gastric antral biopsies were examined histologically and by the quick urease test and were compared with H. pylori serology and the 13C-UBT in a prospective study of 50 children referred to a tertiary center. Thirty-two patients had gastritis and of these, 19 had histologically proven H. pylori gastritis. Seventeen of these 19 patients had a positive 13C-UBT. The sensitivity and specificity of the 13C-UBT compared with the histologic diagnosis of H. pylori was 89 and 90% respectively. The 13C-UBT was more specific than the H. pylori serology. The 13C-UBT using two breath collections is a reliable and noninvasive diagnostic test for H. pylori infection in children.Helicobacter pylori: use of a stool antigen detection test and a six-day triple therapy.Helicobacter pylori stool antigen test (HpSA) for the diagnosis of gastric infection.To determine the accuracy of Helicobacter pylori Stool Antigen test (HpSA), compared with endoscopic histopathology for the diagnosis of gastric Helicobecter pylori infection.Cross-sectional study. PLACE AND DURATION OF THE STUDY: Medical Unit ll, Abbasi Shaheed Hospital, Karachi, from March 2003 to March 2004.A total of 50 patients underwent endoscopy for gastric antral mucosal tissue biopsy for histopathology of H.pylori and advised for HpSA. Patient's information including age, gender, past history, presenting signs and symptoms, results of HpSA and histopathology were recorded. Sensitivity analysis was performed to calculate sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of HpSA.Among 50 patients, 48% males and 52% females (M: F 1: 1.08), a total of 27 (54%) were true positive while 20 (40%) were true negative. Two patients were false negative and only one was false positive. Sensitivity of HpSA was, therefore, 93.1%, specificity 95% and positive and negative predictive values were 96.42% and 90.9% respectively.Helicobacter pylori stool antigen was an accurate and reliable test for the diagnosis of gastric H. pylori infection.Stool antigen test in diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori in older adults with dyspepsia.[Value of urease breath test in helicobacter pylori infection diagnostics among children and youth].One of non-invasive methods of Helicobacter pylori diagnostics is the breath test with urea 13C.of the study was to estimate the sensitivity and specificity of urea breath test (UBT) in Helicobacter pylori (Hp) infection diagnosis among children and youth.medical records of 100 patients, hospitalised due to gastrointestinal disorders, between 3 and 18 years of age were analysed. In all patients urea breath test, endoscopy of upper gastrointestinal tract with macroscopic assessment of gastric and duodenal mucosa and morphologic assessment of biopsy specimens were performed.positive results of urea breath test were present in twenty-six patients. In five patients (5%) breath test was positive despite the lack of Helicobacter pylori infection in histhopathology samples. This group was 19.23% of all patients who had positive result of breath test. Among 21 (21%) patients result of breath test was correlated with positive result of histhopathology studies. This group was 80.77% of all patients with positive results of breath test. Among the remaining 74 patients (74%) results of breath test were negative. The results of Hp and UBT correlation are as follows: in 64% children: Hp (-), UBT (-), in 5% Hp (-), UBT (+), in 10% children: Hp (+), UBT (-), in 24%, Hp (+), UBT (+)result of urea breath test should be verified by endoscopy studies with morphologic assessment of specimens to avoid overdiagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection.A new, non-invasive method for detection of Helicobacter pylori: validity in the routine clinical setting.Helicobacter pylori has been recognised as a major gastric pathogen. Many techniques to identify infection have been developed, including histology and culture as invasive tests and the urea breath test as non-invasive technology. Recently, another non-invasive test based on the detection of H. pylori antigens in stool specimens was introduced.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of this novel enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for detection of H. pylori infection in comparison with histology.Stool specimens of 72 consecutive patients who had gastroscopy with biopsy at our endoscopy unit were collected and frozen at -20 degrees C until further processing. H. pylori status was determined as part of the routine histological work-up. In a second step, histology slides were reviewed by a pathologist who specialized in gastrointestinal pathology. Stool samples were tested for the presence of H. pylori antigen using the PREMIER H. pylori Stool Antigen Test. Sensitivity and specificity of routine histopathology and the H. pylori Stool Antigen Test were determined using the diagnosis of the expert gastrointestinal histopathologist as gold standard.Routine histopathology resulted in a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 92% in the diagnosis of H. pylori. These results compare well with the results of the H. pylori Stool Antigen Test that revealed a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 98%.The H. pylori Stool Antigen Test is a promising non-invasive test for the detection of H. pylori infection.Contribution of the 13C-urea breath test to the detection of Helicobacter pylori gastritis in children.Serology, 13C-urea breath test, histology, Campylobacter-like organism testing, and culture were performed in 95 consecutive children to evaluate the contribution of these tests to the detection of Helicobacter pylori infection. In analyses considering any combination of three positive tests as "gold standard" for diagnosing H pylori infection, 26 children were Helicobacter positive (27%), which is only one patient more than the number of children with only a positive culture. The accuracy of culture was excellent when "any combination of three positive tests" was used as the gold standard (sensitivity 96%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100% [false positivity 0%], negative predictive value 99% [false-negative results 1%]). The results of invasive and noninvasive tests were comparable. When culture was considered as "gold standard," the sensitivity of serology and 13C-urea breath test was 96%; the specificity was 96% and 93%, respectively; the positive predictive value was 89% and 83% (false-positive results in 11% and 17%); and the negative predictive value for both was 99% (false-negative results in 1%). It is concluded that culture can be used as gold standard, but that non-invasive tests such as serology and/or 13C-urea breath test can be used to diagnose H pylori infection in children, since each has at least 95% sensitivity and 92% specificity.[Antigen detection in stools as a first choice for laboratory diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori disease].Several techniques have been suggested for Helicobacter pylori infection diagnosis, invasive (histology) and not invasive (Urea Breath Test C13, or serological assays). An enzyme immunoassay able to detect Helicobacter pylori antigen directly in stool specimens was recently developed. A study was carried out in order to evaluate the sensibility and the specificity of this test comparing it with the Urea Breath Test C13 and histology. The patients studied are all in pediatric age, and great are the advantages of a non-invasive method to detect infection.In this study 60 patients were enrolled. In 34 of them Helicobacter pylori infection was diagnosed by Urea Breath Test C13, all confirmed by histology. In all the 60 patients studied the fecal antigen was researched by an immunoenzymatic method (Premier Platinum HpSA, Meridian Diag.).The detection of Helicobacter pylori in stool shows a sensibility of 100% and a specificity of 97%.Sensibility and specificity, considering also the low cost of the examination, the short time to perform it and the very easy technique, allows us to propose the test as the first choice in the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori disease.Agreement between serology and histology for detection of Helicobacter pylori infection.To determine the percentage agreement between serology and histology for detection of Helicobacter (H.) pylori infection.Cross-sectional analytical study.Department of Pathology and Microbiology, The Aga Khan University and Hospital, Karachi, from January to December 2009.Fifty subjects were selected by non-probability purposive sampling from laboratory data who had serological testing of H. pylori IgG antibody, prior to histological evaluation of endoscopic gastric or/and duodenal biopsies. Serological Quantification of H. pylori IgG was carried out with HpG screen ELISA kit (Genesis Diagnostics, UK), using an enzyme linked immunosorbent assay for detection of IgG antibodies against H. pylori. Manufacturer's recommended cutoff value was used and results were considered positive when greater than 7 U/ml. For histological diagnosis, an expert histopathologist characterized the presence of spiral bacteria in the mucosal layer or the surface of epithelial cells on microscopic examination, as a positive test.An agreement of 0.72 was found by Kappa statistics between serology and histopathology results and a good diagnostic accuracy (86%) of serological testing was observed for the diagnosis of H. pylori infection.A substantial agreement was found between serology and histopathology results to detect the H. pylori infection. Laboratory-based serologic testing using ELISA technology to detect IgG antibodies is inexpensive, noninvasive and convenient method to detect the H. pylori infection in primary care setting.Helicobacter pylori infection diagnosis in hospitalised elderly patients: the stool antigen test (HpSA) in comparison with other methods.Helicobacter pylori (Hp) infection prevalence increases with age. In elderly patients, who often do not collaborate and who are affected by multiple pathologies, worldwide-recognised invasive and non-invasive methods (histology and Urea Breath Test) are not easy to apply. A new test based on the detection of Hp antigens in the stool (HpSA test) is now available. The aim of our study was to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the HpSA test, and the interference of drugs (acid suppression, antibiotics) on test performance.Hp infection was detected by UBT, HpSA and histology in 122 hospitalised elderly subjects, divided into two groups according to therapy in the last month. Subjects were classified as being Hp-positive if two test results (histology and UBT) were positive, and Hp-negative if the same two test results were negative.The sensitivity and specificity of the HpSA test compared with two tests (histology and UBT) were respectively 76 and 95%. In the group of patients who had not received drugs, the sensitivity and specificity of the HpSA test were respectively 76 and 96%. Instead, in the group of patients who had received pharmacological therapy, sensitivity and specificity values were respectively 67 and 100%. HpSA-positive patients had received acid suppression for 9.2 +/- 8.9 days, and false-negative patients for 27.2 +/- 9.9 days.The HpSA test is simple, inexpensive, and non-invasive for Hp detection, especially in elderly subjects with no compliance. It is influenced only after several days by therapy common in the elderly.Diagnostic value of rapid urease test and urea breath test for Helicobacter pylori detection in patients with Billroth II gastrectomy: a prospective controlled trial.The aim of this work was to assess the reliability of rapid urease test (RUT) and urea breath test (UBT) for detecting Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) in patients with Billroth II (BII) gastrectomy, using histology as reference.In this prospective controlled study, 31 consecutive patients with BII gastrectomy and 73 controls who had an indication for endoscopy were included. Their H. pylori status was assessed with biopsies for histology, RUT and UBT. Histology served as the gold standard. Only the biopsies from the gastric fundus were evaluated. Specificity, sensitivity, positive and negative predictive value, degree of agreement and k-statistics were used.RUT and UBT for detecting H. pylori in the control group had excellent agreement [97%, kappa (k)=0.94 and 99%, k=0.97 respectively] with biopsies. In BII patients, RUT from fundic biopsies had very good agreement (87%, k=0.74) compared to histology from fundic biopsies, whereas the UBT was unreliable (agreement: 71%, k=0.41) compared to histology.The RUT from fundic biopsies in BII patients is a reliable test for H. pylori detection, whereas the UBT is unreliable.Stool antigen testing for the diagnosis and confirmation of eradication of Helicobacter pylori infection: a prospective blinded trial.Helicobacter pylori is an established pathogen for a wide spectrum of gastroduodenal diseases. We investigated the usefulness of H. pylori stool antigen test (HpSA) before and after eradication therapy on patients referred for gastroscopy.Over a 12-month period, 127 adult patients (47% males) underwent HpSA and gastroscopy with dual biopsies from the antrum and proximal body of the stomach for urease and histology. The positive patients (histology, urease or combined positive) received triple therapy consisting of clarithromycin 500 mg, amoxycillin 1 g and omeprazole 20 mg, each given twice daily for 7 days. Six weeks post-therapy, eradication was verified with the 13C-urea breath test (UBT) and the HpSA results compared on a second stool sample.Pre-therapy, 23/113 patients were positive by urease test, 22/112 by histology and 22/112 were combined positive. For the HpSA, compared to combined urease and histology as the reference standards, the sensitivity and specificity were 79 and 92% while the positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) were 68 and 96%, respectively. Post-therapy, UBT was adopted as the reference standard and 18 paired samples were available for analysis: three were positive and 15 were negative. Sensitivity and specificity were 67 and 100% while the PPV and NPV were 100 and 94%, respectively.In this prospective study, HpSA was found to be a reasonably useful diagnostic test for H. pylori infection. Post-eradication, it was highly specific and similar to UBT in terms of PPV and NPV. The test is non-invasive and cheaper than the urease test or the UBT, making it a candidate in the investigation of dyspepsia.A new, practical, low-dose 14C-urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection: clinical validation and comparison with the standard method.The carbon-14 urea breath test (UBT) is a reliable and non-invasive technique for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori (HP) infection. In this study we evaluated the diagnostic performance of a new, practical and low-dose (14)C-UBT system for the diagnosis of HP and compared the results with those obtained using the standard method. Seventy-five patients (56 female, 19 male) with dyspepsia underwent (14)C-UBT and endoscopy with antral biopsies for histological analysis. The rapid urease test (CLO test) was applied to 50 of these patients. After a 6-h fasting period, a 37-kBq (14)C-urea capsule was swallowed for UBT. Breath samples were collected and counted using two different methods, the Heliprobe method and the standard method. In the Heliprobe method, patients exhaled into a special dry cartridge system (Heliprobe BreathCard) at 10 min. The activities of the cartridges were counted using a designated small GM counter system (Heliprobe analyser). Results were expressed both as counts per minute (HCPM) and as grade (0, not infected; 1, equivocal; 2, infected) according to the counts. In the standard method, breath samples were collected by trapping in a liquid CO(2) absorber. Radioactivity was counted as disintegrations per minute (SDPM) using a liquid scintillation counter after addition of a liquid scintillation cocktail. Histological examination was used as a gold standard. Two patients were excluded from the study because of inadequate biopsy sampling. Forty-eight patients (65%) were found to be HP positive on histology. The Heliprobe method correctly classified 48 of 48 HP-positive patients and 19 of 25 HP-negative patients (sensitivity 100%, specificity 76%, PPV 88%, NPV 100%, accuracy 91%). The standard method correctly classified 48 of 48 HP-positive patients and 20 of 25 HP-negative patients (sensitivity 100%, specificity 80%, PPV 90%, NPV 100%, accuracy 93%). On the other hand, the CLO test identified 26 of 32 HP-positive and 12 of 16 HP-negative patients (sensitivity 81%, specificity 75%, PPV 86%, NPV 66%, accuracy 79%). With the Heliprobe method, all of the positive results were grade 2, and all of the negative results were grade 0. No patients were defined as having grade 1 results. Counts allowed clear discrimination of HP-positive and -negative patients with both methods, the difference being statistically significant in each case ( P<0.001). A significant correlation was found between HCPM and SDPM ( r 0.863, P<0.001). According to the ROC analysis, the area under the curve was nearly the same with HCPM (AUC, 0.888; 95% CI, 0.785-0.992) and SDPM (AUC, 0.898; 95% CI, 0.802-0.994). In conclusion, the new (14)C-UBT system is a highly accurate method for the diagnosis of HP infection. It is rapid and practical, and therefore suitable for clinical and office practice.Comparison of stool antigen test with gastric biopsy for the detection of Helicobacter Pylori infection.Helicobacter Pylori (H.pylori) is one of the most important causes of dyspepsia and diagnosis can be made by invasive or non-invasive methods. One of the non-invasive methods, H.pylori stool antigen test (HpSA) is simple, fast and relatively inexpensive. According to this view with regard to gastric biopsy as a gold standard the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of this method were calculated.Stool samples of 61 patients who underwent upper endoscopy and gastric biopsy due to dyspepsia were evaluated for H. Pylori stool antigen using sandwich ELISA method.From the 61 patients who participated in this study, H.pylori was diagnosed in 38 (62.3%) gastric biopsies, 25(66%) of these had positive HpSA test. Also, of 27 (37.7%) positive HpSA cases, H.pylori was seen in 25 gastric biopsies. For this method, sensitivity of 66% with 93% positive predictive value was calculated. Also, 91% specificity with 62% negative predictive value was estimated.High positive HpSA indicates high risk of H.pylori infection and high specificity shows that the likelihood of false positive is low. Therefore, physicians can trust on this method and start patient`s treatment.Comparison of enzyme immunoassays detecting Helicobacter pylori specific IgG in serum and saliva with endoscopic and biopsy findings in patients with dyspepsia.To compare the performance of two indirect enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA) detecting Helicobacter pylori (HP)-specific IgG antibodies in serum and saliva with endoscopic observations and histologic findings of biopsies from dyspeptic patients, in an area of high HP prevalence.Sera, saliva and antral biopsies were obtained from 55 dyspeptic patients. IgG antibodies against HP were assayed in sera and saliva utilizing two indirect ELISAs. Biopsies were processed according to standard procedures in order to detect histological changes and the presence or absence of Helicobacter pylori. Laboratory data thus obtained were compared and statistically analyzed.Forty-two (76.36%) biopsies were positive for HP. The organisms were detected in 4 of 16 (25%) cases with normal endoscopic findings, in all 16 cases of gastritis and in 22 of the 23 (95.6%) cases of duodenal ulcers (DU). Serum and saliva HP-specific IgG antibodies were detected in 4 normal cases with positive biopsies, in 12 and 14 cases of gastritis, respectively, and in all 22 (100%) biopsy positive cases of DU. The sensitivities of the serum and saliva tests were 90.5% and 95%, respectively, while the specificities were 84.5% and 70%, respectively.Due to their high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing HP-associated DU and gastritis, serum and saliva antibody testing seems to offer a valuable alternative to invasive procedures especially in areas of high HP prevalence such as ours; saliva antibody testing is simple and practical especially in children and in difficult patients who resent venipuncture.Performance of two immunosorbent assay kits for the detection of serum immunoglobulin G to Helicobacter pylori in untreated greek patients.The performance of serological methods used to detect Helicobacter pylori varies with the ethnicity and prevalence of the infection in the community. We have prospectively evaluated the performance of two commercially available serum enzyme immunoassays (EIA) detecting H. pylori immunoglobulin G (IgG) antibodies in the sera of untreated Greek patients.One-hundred-and-thirty consecutive untreated dyspeptic patients underwent endoscopy with biopsies from the gastric body (n = 2) and antrum (n = 2). Serum samples were also obtained from each patient. Serum H. pylori IgG antibody titres were determined with two EIA kits (Pyloriset EIA-G and Milenia H. pylori IgG). Sensitivities, specificities and optimal cut-off values of serum EIAs were determined for the population under investigation by using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis and histology as gold standard.Ninety-seven patients were defined H. pylori-positive and 33 negative by histology. ROC curve analysis for the Pyloriset kit yielded 86% (95% CI, 78%-92%) sensitivity and 85% (68%-95%) specificity at an optimal cut-off value of >358 units/ml. The respective values for the Milenia kit were 86% (78%-92%) and 82% (65%-93%) at an optimal cut-off value of >51 units/ml. The suggested cut-off values of the manufacturers for Pyloriset and Milenia kits are >300 and >44 EIA units, respectively, which yield 2% and 4% higher sensitivity, but 9% lower specificity for both EIA kits.Both serum EIA kits performed well in our study. Our data show that EIA cut-off values should be optimized for the population under investigation.[The diagnostic value of 13C-urea breath test in Helicobacter pylori colonization density and the severity of gastritis].To evaluate the diagnostic value of (13)C-urea breath test (UBT) in Helicobacter pylori (Hp) colonization density and the severity of gastritis.The diagnostic accuracy of UBT in the diagnosis of Hp infection with reference to histology (HE and Warthin-Starry stain) was analyzed and the UBT results (DOB values) among the groups of gastritis with different degrees of severity were compared.By using UBT, 96 of 103 patients with Hp -positive histology were detected (sensitivity, 93.2%), the specificity was 89.1%. DOB value in the Hp colonization dense group was significantly higher than in the other groups (low and moderately dense) (P < 0.05). A significant but weak, correlation was found between the DOB values and the colonization density either with (rs = 0.599 0, P < 0.000 1) or without (r(s) = 0.245 7, P = 0.015 8) inclusion of histologically negative patients. In Hp positive patients, DOB values neither in the groups of active gastritis (0 - 3 grade) nor in the groups of chronic gastritis (1 - 3 grade) had no significant difference. There was no correlation between DOB values and severity of inflammatory infiltration.(13)C-UBT has high sensitivity and specificity in the detection of Hp infection. There is significant but weak, correlation between DOB values and the colonization density of Hp. DOB values could not reflect the density of neutrophil and lymphocyte infiltration.Evaluation of a newly developed rapid stool antigen test using an immunochromatographic assay to detect Helicobacter pylori.The ASAN Easy Test H. pylori is a newly developed rapid test for Helicobacter pylori that uses a stool antigen immunochromatographic assay (S-ICT). The aim of this study was to evaluate this kit for the diagnosis of H. pylori under various histological conditions. We enrolled 266 consecutive patients undergoing a routine health checkup and endoscopy with biopsy. H. pylori infection was confirmed if at least 2 out of the 3 following tests were positive: histology, real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and the stool antigen test by enzyme immunoassay (S-EIA). Histological examination was performed using hematoxylin-eosin and silver staining. Real-time PCR was performed with a probe for the UreA gene as described previously. The S-EIA and the evaluated kit were used according to the manufacturers' instructions. Of the 266 patients, 209 were eligible for participation. The evaluation results were as follows: sensitivity, 84.5%; specificity, 96.2%; positive-predictive value, 95.6%; negative-predictive value, 86.4%; and accuracy, 90.4%. The performance of the kit was unaffected by histological findings such as atrophic gastritis, ulcers, and intestinal metaplasia. The newly developed S-ICT assay is a non-invasive rapid test for the diagnosis of H. pylori that exhibits good performance in routine health checkup patients.Accuracy of the [13C]-urea breath test in diagnosing Helicobacter pylori gastritis in pediatric patients.The causal association between Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) colonization of the gastric mucosa and gastritis is now well established. Histologic examination of endoscopic biopsy specimens has long been regarded as the gold standard for diagnosis. However, the changes can be focal in nature and presence of the organism may be missed in nonsampled areas. The urea breath test, which uses a stable isotope, offers distinct advantages, in that it is noninvasive and measures the activity of the micro-organism. It thus represents a potentially invaluable tool in the initial diagnosis of the infection and in verifying its eradication.The study design was that of a prospective, blinded comparison of the [13C]-urea breath test with histologic assessment of antral biopsy specimens using the Warthin-Starry stain, to diagnose H. pylori infection in a group of 79 consecutive pediatric patients.Patients classified as negative by histology (n=67) had breath 13C enrichment of 0.97+/-0.07 delta per thousand (mean+/-SEM), with a range of -0.20 and 2.83 delta per thousand. In contrast, those with a positive histologic results (n=12) had an enrichment of 25.41+/-5.01 delta per thousand (range, 3.43-58.80; p < 0.001). At the chosen cutoff point of 3 delta per thousand, the sensitivity and specificity as well as the positive and negative predictive values of the breath test were uniformly 100%.The [13C]-urea breath test is a highly reliable, noninvasive method for the diagnosis of H. pylori gastritis in children and adolescents.Diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection with the (13)C-urea breath test by means of GC-MS analysis.The diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) infection by GC-MS detection of the (13)CO(2) enrichment in (13)C-urea breath test ((13)C-UBT) samples is reported. This study aimed to optimize the (13)C-UBT with regards to the diagnostic cut-off value, sampling time, and frequency. The H. pylori status of 103 dyspeptic patients was obtained by histological examination, the rapid urease test as well as with the GC-MS (13)C-UBT. Analytical and diagnostic accuracies were determined by comparison of the GC-MS (13)C-UBT results with that of the analytical and diagnostic gold standards, namely GC-isotope ratio MS (IRMS) and histology. The (13)CO(2) enrichment values obtained with GC-MS analysis, correlated favorably (r(2) = 0.993) with those obtained by GC-IRMS analysis. When compared to histology, the GC-MS (13)C-UBT had a diagnostic sensitivity of 92% and a specificity of 93%. The positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy were 95, 89, and 92%, respectively. It was concluded that SIM GC-MS is capable of analyzing nonradioactive (13)C-UBT samples, with a precision and accuracy sufficient to distinguish between H. pylori positive and negative patients.Comparison of carbon-14-urea breath test and rapid urease test with gastric biopsy for identification of Helicobacter pylori.Diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection by stool antigen test in southern Taiwan.Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) has been found to be associated with various gastrointestinal diseases. Confirmation of H. pylori infection includes invasive and non-invasive methods. There has been increasing interest in noninvasive tests recently. However, the geographical differences among H. pylori strains have been emphasized recently and the H. pylori strain in Taiwan showed a high cagA positive result and different vacA subtype when compared with those of Western countries. The aim of this study is to access and compare the reliability and the diagnostic accuracy of the stool H. pylori antigen tests by spectrophotometry and by the visual method, especially in Southern Taiwan. Thirty-two patients (18 men and 14 women; age range: 23-91 y/o, mean: 50.5 y/o) who underwent gastroendoscopy at Kaohsiung Medical University Hospital were enrolled in this study. H. pylori infection status was confirmed by culture or two positive test results on CLO test, histology and 13C-urea breath test (13C-UBT). The exclusion criteria included previous gastrointestinal tract surgery, use of antibiotics, proton pump inhibitor or compounds containing bismuth within 1 month of the study. Among them, 14 patients were with duodenal ulcer (DU), 4 with gastric ulcer (GU), 12 with non-ulcer dyspepsia, and 2 with GU and DU. Those patients had their stool collected for ELISA tests of H. pylori stool antigen (HpSA). The HpSA tests were positive in 16 of 18 patients diagnosed as H. pylori positive, and negative in 13 of 14 patients as H. pylori negative. The sensitivity and specificity were 88.9% and 92.9% respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 94.1% and 86.7% respectively. The concordance of HpSA accessed by spectrophotometry and visual method is 100%, which makes this test even easier and cheaper. We concluded that stool HpSA test is a noninvasive, accurate, reliable, rapid and easy way to diagnose H. pylori infection in Southern Taiwan, either by spectrophotometry or by visual assessment.Comparison of biopsy and serological methods of diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection and the potential role of antibiotics.Endoscopic biopsy and serological methods were compared for their ability to detect Helicobacter pylori infection in patients undergoing upper gastrointestinal endoscopy at a state university hospital.Subjects were characterized on the basis of gastrointestinal symptoms, endoscopic findings, socioeconomic and demographic features, and the use of certain medications, tobacco, and alcohol. Current infection was detected in gastric antral specimens by rapid urease testing, histopathology, and bacterial culture. Serum levels of IgG to H. pylori were measured by ELISA.Of 240 subjects, 115 (47.9%) were currently infected as determined by rapid urease testing, histopathology, and/or culture results, whereas 63.3% had elevated anti-H. pylori IgG levels (p < 0.001). This difference in the prevalence of current infection and seropositivity was preserved when the study population was analyzed according to age, race, gender, and other characteristics. Prior use of antibiotics was associated with a significant reduction in the frequency of H. pylori infection.Serological evidence of H. pylori infection was consistently greater than the prevalence of infection documented by biopsy methods in this study, suggesting suppression or recent clearance of infection. Further studies are needed to examine the factors that may affect the detection of H. pylori infection.Validity and cost comparison of 14carbon urea breath test for diagnosis of H Pylori in dyspeptic patients.To validate and compare the cost of microdose 14C urea breath test (UBT) with histology and rapid urease test for the diagnosis of H Pylori.Ninety-four consecutive patients with dyspeptic symptoms undergoing gastroscopy were enrolled. Gastric biopsies were taken for histology and rapid urease test. UBT was performed after gastroscopy by microdose 14C urea capsules. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of UBT were calculated and compared with histology and rapid urease test. Cost comparison of these tests was also performed.H pylori was diagnosed by histology and rapid urease test in 66 (70%) and 61 (65%) patients, while 14C UBT detected infection in 63 (67%). Accuracy of UBT was 93% in comparison with histology while its positive and negative predictive values were 97% and 84%, respectively. Comparison of 14C UBT with rapid urease test gives an accuracy of 96%, with positive and negative predictive values of 95% and 97%, respectively. These results were highly reproducible with a Kappa test (P value<0.001). Cost of histology or rapid urease test with gastroscopy was 110 USD or 95 USD respectively while the cost of UBT was 15 USD.Microdose 14C UBT was comparable to histology and rapid urease test. 14C UBT is an economical, self sufficient and suitable test to diagnose active H pylori infection in less developed countries.Clinical Validation of an Office-Based C-UBT (Heliprobe) for H. pylori Diagnosis in Iranian Dyspeptic Patients.Background. We encountered repeatedly, in our clinical practice, discordant results between UBT and histopathology about H. pylori infection. Goal. To study the diagnostic accuracy of Heliprobe (14)C-urea breath test ((14)C-UBT) for detection of H. pylori infection in an Iranian population. Study. We enrolled 125 dyspeptic patients in our study. All of them underwent gastroscopy, and four gastric biopsies (three from the antrum and one from the corpus) were obtained. One of the antral biopsies was utilized for a rapid urease test (RUT), and three others were evaluated under microscopic examination. Sera from all patients were investigated for the presence of H. pylori IgG antibodies. The (14)C-UBT was performed on all subjects using Heliprobe kit, and results were analyzed against the following gold standard (GS): H. pylori infection considered positive when any two of three diagnostic methods (histopathology, RUT, serology) are positive. Results. According to data analysis, the Heliprobe (14)C-UBT had 94% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 93% negative predictive value (NPV), 100% positive predictive value (PPV), and 97% accuracy, compared with GS. Conclusion. The Heliprobe (14)C-UBT is an easy-to-perform, rapid-response, and accurate test for H. pylori diagnosis, suitable for office use.Dual versus triple therapy of Helicobacter pylori infection: results of a multicentre trial.To compare dual therapy (omeprazole and amoxicillin) with triple therapy (omeprazole, amoxicillin, and clarithromycin) in the treatment of Helicobacter pylori infection. The efficacy of 1 mg/kg/day omeprazole was randomly compared with 2 mg/kg/day.252 patients (median age, 11.0 years; range, 3-18) presenting with chronic abdominal pain underwent endoscopy and a 13C-urea breath test. Gastric biopsy specimens were taken for histological examination and for the rapid urease test. Patients were treated for two weeks: group A (n = 63) received amoxicillin (50 mg/kg; maximum, 2 g/day), group B (n = 73) received amoxicillin and clarithromycin (20 mg/kg; maximum, 1 g/day). Both groups were randomly treated with either 1 or 2 mg/kg omeprazole (maximum, 80 mg/day). Diagnostic procedures were repeated four weeks after the end of treatment.11 patients were excluded; 136 patients were H pylori positive (56%), 105 of whom were re-examined after treatment. Helicobacter pylori was eradicated in 52% of group A and 83% of group B. The dose of omeprazole had no influence on the eradication rate. Specificity and sensitivity of the rapid urease test were 94% and 93%, respectively. Specificity and sensitivity of the 13C-urea breath test were 93% and 95%, respectively.Dual therapy can no longer be recommended. Triple therapy is more effective than dual therapy in the eradication of H pylori infection. The lower dose of 1 mg/kg omeprazole was as effective as 2 mg/kg.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of non-invasive tests for Helicobacter pylori infection in children.To compare urea breath and stool antigen in children, with histological diagnosis for Helicobacter pylori (H.pylori) infection.Cross-sectional study.From June 2005 to December 2005 carried out at KRL Hospital, Islamabad and Children Hospital, PIMS, Islamabad.Children between 3 and 15 years of age reporting in pediatric outpatient department with upper gastrointestinal symptoms were included. All the participating children underwent an upper gastrointestinal endoscopy and 3 tests namely: histopathological identification of H. pylori (the traditional gold standard), urea breath test and stool antigen test were carried out on each child. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive values were calculated for each noninvasive test used in the study.A total of 54 patients completed the study with a mean age of 8.2 years. On histological examination, 72% (39) were positive for H. pylori infection. On gross endoscopic examination, only 9 patients had signs of gastritis as compared to 39 histological positives. The sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of stool antigen test were: 77%, 73% and 89% respectively whereas the same for urea breath test were: 79%, 80% and 91% respectively.Both the noninvasive tests were found to be sensitive and specific as compared with histological identification, for the diagnosis of H. pylori in our pediatric population. The accuracy of urea breath test was better than the stool antigen test but later was easier to perform and could fulfill the criteria for a rapid bedside diagnostic test.37 kBq 14C-urea breath test and gastric biopsy analyses of H. pylori infection.The treatment of H. pylori-associated gastroduodenal disease is increasingly aimed at bacterial eradication which requires follow-up assessment of therapeutic effectiveness and re-infection. A simplified 37 kBq 14C-urea breath test for H. pylori infection has been developed.The 37 kBq 14C-urea breath test was compared with biopsy urease (CLO) and histological analyses of gastric-biopsies obtained from 63 patients undergoing endoscopy.The 30-min breath test correlated closely with biopsy findings, had a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity of 95% and a positive predictive value of 92%.The simplified, low-dose, 14C-urea breath test is a convenient, low-cost, transportable means of facilitating the management of H. pylori-associated diseases.Detection of Helicobacter pylori antigen in stool samples for diagnosis of infection in children.The study evaluated a non-invasive antigen test of stool samples for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection in children compared with histopathology of gastric biopsies (gold standard). The study included 96 children aged 1-15 years old with dyspeptic symptoms referred for endoscopy at Tabriz Children's Hospital, Tabriz, Islamic Republic of Iran from May 2003 to March 2004. Of 62 children who were positive by histology, 34 were H. pylori stool antigen positive and of 34 patients with negative histology, 27 had negative stool test. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were low (54.8% and 79.4% respectively) compared with the gold standard and the positive and negative predictive values were 82.9% and 49.9%. However, the test may be useful for mass screening for H. pylori.Accuracy and clinical utility of the mini-dose 14C-urea breath test in the evaluation of Helicobacter pylori infection.The aim of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of the 14C-urea breath test by comparing the results to those obtained by endoscopy with mucosal biopsy. We also examined the value of the breath test result obtained prior to endoscopy in predicting peptic ulcer disease. Forty-two individuals underwent the 14C-urea breath test. Collections of expired C02 were analysed using a liquid scintillation counter. All individuals then underwent endoscopy with biopsy. Biopsy material was evaluated by the rapid urease method and by histology for the presence of H. pylori. Our results demonstrated that the 14C-urea breath test was 100% sensitive and specific when compared to the rapid urease test as the 'gold standard' for the detection of H. pylori. In comparison to pathology, the sensitivity remained 100% and the specificity was 89%. The results of the 14C-urea breath test had a poor predictive value for the determination of peptic ulcer disease. We conclude that the 14C-urea breath test can be easily performed at any medical facility equipped with a liquid scintillation counter and can accurately detect H. pylori. A negative breath test result could not exclude the presence of peptic ulcer disease.The utility of the Helicobacter pylori stool antigen test in managing dyspepsia: an experience from a low resource setting.Dyspepsia is defined as a chronic or recurrent pain or discomfort centered in the upper abdomen. Endoscopy is the best strategy for confirming the cause of dyspepsia. Non- invasive strategies would be more appropriate in low resource countries where endoscopy is not readily available. However, there is concern that these strategies may miss serious disease like gastric cancer. One test that needs to be assessed in this regard is the Helicobacter pylori stool antigen test (HPSAT).To determine the validity of the stool antigen test in predicting H. pylori associated disease among patients with dyspepsia.In this prospective study patients with dyspepsia attending Mulago Hospital were recruited consecutively. Helicobacter pylori was determined using the Rapid Strip HpSA , endoscopy and gastric mucosal biopsy were done.167 patients with dyspepsia were recruited into the study. There were ninety six (57.5%) females and seventy one (42.5%) males with an average age of 48.1(18.1) years. Patients presenting with dyspepsia in Mulago hospital were more likely to come from the Central 60 (36%) and western tribes 55 (33%). The commonest endoscopic finding was oesophagitis 25 (15%). Peptic ulcer disease was found in 32 (19.2%) and 54 (32.3%) had normal endoscopy findings. H pylori was found in 33.5% and 32.5% using the HPSAT and histology respectively. The validity of the HPSAT in predicting H.pylori associated diseases was generally low with an overall sensitivity of 55.8%, and specificity of 74.2%. However, the validity was higher in predicting the diagnosis of peptic ulcer disease with a sensitivity 59.4% and specificity 72.6%.The HPSAT may be used in the test and treat strategy for young patients with dyspepsia without alarm signs and symptoms in low resource settings. However, because of its low validity in predicting H.pylori associated disease, it is important to follow up patients so that if symptoms persist or recur endoscopy is performed.13C-urea breath test in Helicobacter pylori diagnosis and eradication. Correlation to histology, origin of 'false' results, and influence of food intake.Which protocol is optimal for the 13C-urea breath test (UBT) for Helicobacter pylori detection is controversial. This study aimed to characterize a very simple UBT protocol for the clinical routine (two-point-analysis performed with 75 mg 13C-urea and citric acid) with special consideration of 'false' UBT results. RESULTS; UBT was evaluated in reference to histology (Warthin-Starry). In mismatching results re-gastroscopy was performed. By UBT, 74 of 77 patients with H. pylori-positive histology were detected (sensitivity, 96%). The false-negative UBTs were due to low colonization densities during spontaneous H. pylori elimination or pyloric obstruction. Seven of 49 patients with negative histology had a positive UBT, but re-gastroscopy showed that all of them had a positive histology when multiple antral biopsy specimens were taken (UBT specificity, 100%). UBT correlated only weakly with H. pylori colonization density. No correlation was found between UBT and gastric neutrophil and lymphocyte infiltration. UBT reproducibility was excellent (93 of 94 in a 6-month period). Non-fasting conditions induced a shift to lower UBT results in H. pylori-positive and to higher UBT results in negative patients, resulting in 2 of 10 false-positive and 1 of 10 false-negative UBTs.This simple version of the urea breath test combines the highest sensitivity with excellent reproducibility. It is superior to histologic detection of H. pylori in the clinical routine and an optimal tool for monitoring H. pylori eradication. Fasting conditions are required for the test.Evaluation of invasive and non-invasive methods for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection in symptomatic children and adolescents.Multiple diagnostic methods are available for the detection of Helicobacter pylori infection, but at present no single one can be used as the gold standard.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of 3 invasive and 2 non-invasive methods for detection of Helicobacter pylori infection in symptomatic children and adolescents.Prospective cohort studyPeptic Disease outpatients service, Discipline of Pediatric Gastroenterology, Universidade Federal de So Paulo / Escola Paulista de Medicina.Forty-seven patients who underwent endoscopy because of dyspeptic symptoms.Endoscopy with gastric biopsies for 3 invasive (rapid urease test, histology and culture) and 2 non-invasive methods (a commercial ELISA serology and 13carbon urea breath test - isotope ratio mass spectrometry) for detection of Helicobacter pylori infection.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of each method and agreement and disagreement rates between the methods.Forty-seven patients [mean age, 11y9mo (SD 2y10mo), 27 female and 20 male]; 62% of them were Helicobacter pylori-positive. All methods agreed in 61%, and were negative in 21% and positive in 40%. The greatest concordance between 2 methods occurred between the invasive methods: histology and rapid urease test (89.6%) and histology and culture (87.5%). The greatest sensitivity, considering Helicobacter pylori-positive cases, for any combination of 3 or more tests, was achieved by the rapid urease test (S=100%), followed by histology, serology and 13carbon-urea breath test (S=93.1%) and lastly by culture (S=79.3%). The highest specificity was obtained by histology (100%) and culture (100%), followed by the rapid urease test (84.2%), serology (78.9%) and 13carbon-urea breath test (78.9%).Our results suggest that among invasive methods, an association between the rapid urease test and histology constituted the best choice for the detection of Helicobacter pylori infection. If results of histology and the rapid urease test are different, serology may be recommended.[Helicobacter pylori: 14C urea breath test in clinical practice at a general hospital].Using isotope methods we studied in 125 patients the absence or presence of gastric urease. Carbon 14 urea was given orally, breath samples were collected over a 30 min period, and the amount of 14CO2 excreted every 10 min was determined. The patients were divided in two groups: 1) uninfected with Helicobacter pylori (HP) (n = 64), 2) infected (n = 41), depending on whether the excretion of the 14CO2 in the breath was greater o lower that 1% of the administered dose. Compared with the infected patients the uninfected patients have shown a mean values of 14CO2 in the breath significantly lower at 10-20-30 min. Among 38 patients who underwent both the 14C urea breath test and endoscopy biopsy of the antral mucosa for histological examination, 22 (58%) and 16 (42%) showed positive or negative HP on biopsy respectively. Among these HP-positive patients, 16 (73%) had chronic gastritis, 3 (14%) gastritis acute and 3 (14%) had duodenal ulcer. Excretion of 14CO2 in breath, lower than 1% and higher than 1% has a specificity of 81% and sensitivity accuracy, positive predictive power of 86%, 84% and 86% respectively. In conclusion 14C urea breath test is a simple noninvasive and easy way to detect with high degree of confidence the presence or absence of gastric urease.Diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection: noninvasive methods compared to invasive methods and evaluation of two new tests.Current guidelines recommending Helicobacter pylori eradication treatment without performing endoscopy in certain patients highlight the importance of noninvasive tests. Our aim was to determine the accuracy of two new tests: the antigen stool test and Helicoblot 2.1 (an immunoblot used on serum) as well as the 13C urea breath test and ELISA serology in comparison to invasive tests for the pretreatment diagnosis of H. pylori infection.Helicobacter pylori infection was diagnosed prospectively in 104 untreated patients using eight different tests. Invasive tests included culture, urease test (CLOtest), histology, and PCR; noninvasive tests included the 13C urea breath test, IgG serology (Pyloriset EIA-G), immunoblot (Helicoblot 2.1), and antigen stool detection (Premier Platinum HpSA). A predefined gold standard based on biopsy tests was used to define H. pylori status, as well as an empirical approach.There was no statistically significant difference between the different tests. The sensitivity of the noninvasive tests ranged between 88.9% and 95.6% (stool test: 88.9%, 95% CI: 82.7-95.1, and Helicoblot 2.1: 95.6%, 95% CI: 91.5-99.6) and the specificity ranged between 92.6 and 98.1% (stool test: 94.4%, 95% CI: 84.6-98.8, and Helicoblot 2.1: 92.6%, 95% CI: 91.5-96.2) when a predefined gold standard was used.Most tests had sensitivities, specificities, and predictive values >90%. The noninvasive tests are accurate for the diagnosis of H. pylori infection. Helicoblot 2.1 performed as well as the best ELISA kit. The HpSA is a promising direct noninvasive test that can be applied easily to evaluate H. pylori status.Detection of Helicobacter pylori infection by saliva IgG testing.Most currently available tests for the detection of Helicobacter pylori are invasive, time consuming, or impractical. We examined the test performance of a simple and rapidly administered salivary IgG assay kit in the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection.Patients referred to a tertiary care setting for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy were included in a prospective evaluation of the test performance of the Helisal Kit which uses an ELISA technique to determine IgG antibodies in saliva. The results of the salivary IgG assay were compared to those of the Helisal Serum Kit, and to gastric histology. Two by two contingency table analyses were performed, and 95% confidence intervals (CI) were determined.Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy was performed on 106 patients over a 3-month period. A statistically significant correlation was found between the blood and saliva IgG results (r = 0.60, p = 0.0001). When compared to serum IgG, the salivary assay test performance was: sensitivity 84% (CI: 70-93%), specificity 81% (CI: 69-90%), positive predictive value 76% (CI: 61-87%), negative predictive value 88% (CI: 76-95%), and diagnostic accuracy 88% (CI: 76-95%). Compared with gastric histology, the test performance of the salivary IgG assay decreased to: sensitivity 66% (CI: 52-79%), specificity 74% (CI: 60-85%), positive predictive value 71% (CI: 57-83%), negative predictive value 68% (CI: 55-80%), and diagnostic accuracy 70% (CI: 60-78%). More specifically, the salivary assay gave false-negative results in nine of 17 patients with duodenal ulcers. Results did not vary significantly when outcomes of the salivary and serum assays were combined. The incremental information obtained in the salivary test was greatest in the patient population exhibiting an intermediate pretest probability (30-70%) of being infected with Helicobacter.The salivary IgG results correlated significantly with the serum IgG titers but exhibited only modest test performance, compared with the results of gastric histology. This salivary test may be most useful in certain patient subpopulations or in specific clinical contexts.An evaluation of a serologic test with a current infection marker of Helicobacter pylori before and after eradication therapy in Chinese.Development of an accurate and less cumbersome noninvasive method to detect current Helicobacter pylori infection is essential in clinic. The aim of this study was to evaluate the performance of the CIM test, also known as the Assure H. pylori Rapid Test (Genelabs Diagnostics Pty. Ltd., Singapore), for the diagnosis of current H. pylori infection before and after eradication therapy in Chinese population.A total of 452 eligible people were recruited for this study in Jiangsu Province, China. Each individual underwent a 13C urea breath test (13C-UBT). For the evaluation of CIM test after eradication, 115 H. pylori-positive outpatients were treated with 1-week triple therapy. One month after the end of therapy, the patients underwent 13C-UBT again, and the CIM-test was performed 1, 3, and 6 months after the end of therapy. Its performance (sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy) were determined using the 13C-UBT as a gold standard for H. pylori diagnosis.H. pylori was detected in 221 (65.6%) of the 337 people by 13C-UBT. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of the CIM test were 93.2%, 90.5%, 94.9%, 87.5%, and 92.3%, respectively, using 13C-UBT as a gold standard. One month after eradication therapy, the sensitivity, specificity of CIM test were only 50% and 66.7%, 66.7% and 84.6% 3-month after eradication therapy and the sensitivity, specificity increased to 85.7% and 96.9%, respectively, when CIM test was used 6 months after the end of anti-H. pylori therapy.The CIM test is a simple, rapid, accurate, cheap, and near-people test. It may be satisfactory for detecting H. pylori infection in cases without eradication therapy, but it could not differentiate the past or current infection correctly within 6 months after anti-H. pylori therapy.The 13carbon urea breath test for the noninvasive detection of Helicobacter pylori in children: comparison with culture and determination of minimum analysis requirements.The purpose of the study was to determine the accuracy of the labelled 13carbon urea breath test for the diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori in children and to simplify the 13carbon urea breath test in identifying the most discriminating sampling time.H. pylori was searched for in 100 children aged 10.5+/-4.5 years by histology, bacteriological counts, and culture on antral biopsies together with serology and 13carbon urea breath test. Breath samples were obtained before ingestion (T0) of 75 mg urea-13C and every 10 minutes after until T60. 13CO2 excess ratio was measured by isotope ratio mass spectrometry, and values expressed as delta per mil over baseline enrichment (delta 13CO2). The arithmetic mean (Mdelta 13CO2) of T20 to T60 values was calculated and the test considered positive with Mdelta 3CO2 higher than Mdelta 13CO2 + 3 SD as determined in noninfected children.Mdelta 13CO2 of noninfected children as assessed by culture was 1.4+/-0.6 per mil, determining a positive cut-off value of 3.44 per mil. Mdelta 13CO2 was correlated in 11 children with biopsy bacteriological counts. Both culture and 13carbon urea breath test were positive in 38 of 100 children, without any discordance. Plotting 13carbon urea breath test results at each sampling time versus Mdelta 13CO2 showed weaker correlations at T20, T30, T50, and T60, than at T40. The two-sample method at T0 and T30, T40, T50, had high sensitivity and specificity. Single-sample analysis obtained at T40 gave a comparable sensitivity and a slightly reduced specificity.13carbon urea breath test is sensitive and specific in children. Two samples collected at T0 and T40 provide the most discriminating procedure.A rapid continuous-real-time 13C-urea breath test for the detection of Helicobacter pylori in patients after partial gastrectomy.Before the development of efficient medications for peptic ulcer disease many patients were treated surgically by partial gastrectomy. The pathogenetic role of Helicobacter pylori was also not known yet. Some of these patients may therefore still harbor H. pylori in their remnant stomach as a carcinogenic agent for gastric cancer. This could be even more relevant for patients who were operated for tumors in the stomach. The efficacy of the urea breath test (UBT) is not clear in this population.To study the prevalence of H. pylori and to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the continuous UBT (BreathID) in postgastrectomized patients in Israel. In this system, the pH of the stomach is lowered by the addition of citric acid that may be beneficial in the smaller and more alkalic stomach.We compared retrospectively the results of our continous UBT with a rapid urease test (RUT) and the histology in all our patients who underwent gastroscopy for any clinical indication, and had a history of partial gastrectomy during the years 2002 to 2010. Only patients in whom H. pylori was tested by all the 3 methods during the same day were included in the study. We identified 76 such patients older than 18 years and performed a statistical analysis of all possibly related clinical data. The 3 methods were compared with each other.H. pylori was positive in 14/76 (18.4%) patients when histology was considered as the gold standard method. The positive predictive value of the continuous UBT and the RUT was 0.64 and 0.35, respectively. The negative predictive value was high by both the methods, 0.92 and 0.95, respectively. Weight loss was correlated with positivity for H. pylori (P=0.032) and a longer gastric stump was marginally related to H. pylori (P=0.071). There was no difference for H. pylori positivity between patients with Billroth I or Billroth II operations. Prevalence of H. pylori was not lower in patients who had partial gastrectomy several years earlier.The prevalence of H. pylori is considerable even several years after partial gastrectomy. The BreathID is reliable to exclude H. pylori after partial gastrectomy. The positive predictive value of the UBT is not very high but better than the RUT. We suggest that all positive patients found by the breath test should be treated. Our results support the view that alternative noninvasive methods, such as the stool antigen test should be further studied and compared with the BreathID in larger populations.Detecting Helicobacter pylori infection in hospitalized frail older patients: the challenge.Helicobacter pylori infection has not been well studied in older people, especially in hospitalized, frail patients. The aim of our study was to evaluate the prevalence of the infection in this population using five H. pylori diagnostic tests.Prospective observational study.Geriatric acute care unit of the Department of Geriatrics (Hpital Xavier Arnozan, Pessac, France).One hundred seven consecutively hospitalized patients with a diagnostic indication for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.Geriatric assessment, information on drug intake, indication/results of gastric endoscopy, and results of H. pylori infection diagnostic tests (culture and histological analysis on biopsy specimens, serology, 13carbon-urea breath test (13C-UBT), detection of H. pylori stool antigens (HpSA)) were assessed for each included patient.Fifty-one patients (47.7%) were H. pylori positive with at least one test. 13C-UBT was more frequently positive than the other four tests, with a significant difference from culture, histological analysis, and HpSA (P <.05). Positive 13C-UBT results were significantly associated with H. pylori presence using histological analysis and neutrophil activity of the antrum and corpus. Antibiotic treatments significantly decreased the positivity rate of all of the tests performed, and severe corpus atrophy decreased the positivity rate of culture, histological analysis, and HpSA.Almost one-third of the H. pylori-positive patients would have remained undetected without performing the 13C-UBT. The low prevalence of H. pylori detection in these hospitalized, frail patients may be explained by the high frequency of current and previous antibiotic treatments.Microdose 14C-urea breath test offers diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori in 10 minutes.The urea breath test diagnoses Helicobacter pylori infection of the stomach by identifying the urease enzyme activity of the bacterium. In this "microdose" version of the test, 1 microCi 14C-urea is given orally in a capsule. Our objectives were: 1) to evaluate a microdose 14C-urea breath test capsule in a gastroenterology outpatient setting, 2) to determine the diagnostic ranges of the 14C-urea breath test for HP-positive and HP-negative patients, 3) to define the sensitivity and specificity of the test, and 4) to see whether breath sample results changed when they were mailed to a remote site for analysis.In a prospective blinded study, we breath-tested 200 fasted patients before elective outpatient endoscopy. At endoscopy, two gastric biopsy samples were taken and were examined for curved organisms; a third biopsy specimen was evaluated with a rapid urease test (CLOtest). Breath samples were mailed in aluminized balloons to a testing laboratory.Using a single breath sample collected at 10 min, with > or = 200 dpm as positive, the breath test correctly classified 63 of 65 HP-positive patients (sensitivity 97%, CI 89-99%), and 128 of 135 HP-negative patients (specificity 95%, CI 90-98%). Radiation exposure from the test equated to natural background received in 1 day. No adverse events were caused by the breath test.The 14C-urea capsule breath test (PYtest) is a convenient noninvasive test for the detection of gastric H. pylori infection. Accuracy is equivalent to invasive methods such as histology. Results can be obtained within 15 min if a counting instrument is nearby, or breath samples can be mailed to a testing laboratory for analysis.Prospective screening of dyspeptic patients by Helicobacter pylori serology: a safe policy? The Italian Helicobacter pylori Study Group.Endoscopic screening of all dyspeptic patients is not cost-effective, nor is it feasible in many health-care delivery systems. To select the most appropriate candidates, various preendoscopic screening strategies have been proposed, some of which include Helicobacter pylori serology and patient age. We assessed the value of these two criteria in preendoscopic screening of a large series of dyspeptic patients, and compared the results obtained in a referral hospital (university center with an extensive H. pylori research program) with those in nonreferral hospital (participating centers that did not have such a program).Blood samples for determination of anti-H. pylori IgG antibody were collected from patients with uninvestigated dyspepsia undergoing endoscopy at one referral hospital and in 93 nonreferral hospitals throughout Italy. For IgG antibody assay, an in-house enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) technique was used in the referral hospital, while a commercial kit was used in the nonreferral hospitals.A total of 1638 patients were evaluated at the referral hospital (845 men and 793 women, mean age 46.1 years, range 18-89), and 3281 at the nonreferral hospitals (1718 men and 1563 women, mean age 48.8, range 18-96), respectively. If endoscopy had not been performed in patients who were seronegative for H. pylori and younger than 45 years, 19% versus 17.5% of the tests would have been avoided in the referral and nonreferral hospitals, respectively, while six of 304 ulcers (2%) and no cancers would have been missed versus 35 of 557 ulcers (6.3%) and two of 557 cancers (0.3%).A screening strategy based on age and H. pylori serology is a valid means of selecting dyspeptic patients for endoscopy; however, the policy needs further refinement for use in nonreferral hospitals.Helicobacter pylori stool antigen test: results of a prospective study.There are now many tests and pathological examinations to detect Helicobacter pylori (Hp), but most have disadvantages such as being invasive, expensive, or unobtainable for a widespread population. The Hp stool antigen (SA) test has been advocated as a safe and cost-effective method of diagnosing Hp. Thus, we conducted a prospective study to examine the reliability of the Helicobacter pylori stool antigen (HpSA) test.The subjects were 100 patients who underwent endoscopic manipulation at Istanbul Haseki Education and Research Hospital. Endoscopy specimens were studied by a pathologist, for routine pathological analysis and for the presence of Hp. Fecal specimens were studied using the HpSA test in the laboratory of the Department of Infectious Diseases at our hospital. The pathology results were compared with the HpSA test results, since pathological examination was the reference standard of our study. The Chi(2) test was used for statistical comparison of the values.According to the pathology results, Hp was present in 82 patients, whereas the HpSA test was positive in 77 patients and negative in 23 patients. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 91%, 83%, 96%, and 65%, respectively.The HpSA test results were similar to the pathology results, with sensitivity and specificity of 91% and 83%, respectively. Thus, the HpSA test appears to be an effective method of detecting Hp in patients who are not candidates for endoscopy.Quantification of Helicobacter pylori infection in gastritis and ulcer disease using a simple and rapid carbon-14-urea breath test.Gastric urease was studied isotopically in 230 patients with biopsy-proven normal mucosa or chronic gastritis, including 59 patients with ulcer disease. Carbon-14-urea was given in 25 ml of water without substrate carrier or nutrient-dense meal, and breath samples were collected over a 60-min period. The amount of 14CO2 excreted at 10 min was independent of the rate of gastric emptying and was not quantitatively influenced by the buccal urease activity. The 10-min 14CO2 values discriminated well between Helicobacter pylori positive and negative patients (94% sensitivity, 89% specificity) and correlated with the number of organisms assessed by histology. The test was a good predictor of chronic gastritis (95% sensitivity and 96% specificity), and a quantitative relationship was observed between 14CO2 values and the severity and activity of the gastritis. In H. pylori positive patients, breath 14CO2 was found to be similar in patients with and without ulcer disease, suggesting that the number of bacteria is not a determining factor for the onset of ulceration.Evaluation of Helicobacter pylori with a stool antigen assay in frail, elderly patients.Helicobacter pylori infection has not been studied thoroughly in elderly patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the reliability of stool antigen assay (HpSA) in the assessment of H. pylori infection in hospitalized, frail, elderly patients.The study population consisted of 85 consecutively recruited elderly patients (> or =65 years old) hospitalized between May 1999 and December 2001 with diagnostic indications for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy. Twenty-nine subjects had been receiving treatment with proton-pump inhibitors (PPIs), such as omeprazole (10-20 mg/day) for 2-15 days, and 56 were not receiving treatment. HpSA was evaluated versus UBT (urea breath test), serology and histology: patients with at least two positive results out of the latter three tests were considered positive for H. pylori infection, while patients with at least two negative tests out of three were considered negative.The sensitivity and specificity of HpSA in the 56 untreated patients were, respectively, 76% (true positives TP = 22; false negatives FN = 7) and 93% (true negatives TN = 25; false positives FP = 2). The sensitivity and specificity of HpSA in the 29 patients on PPI treatment were, respectively, 82% (TP = 9; FN = 2) and 83% (TN = 15; FP = 3).HpSA is an accurate, non-invasive and easy method for diagnosing H. pylori infection in elderly patients.Chronic Helicobacter pylori infection in a population in southern Sweden analysed by histopathology, immunoblot and ELISA serology.Many individuals are infected with the bacterium Helicobacter pylori. Some develop ulcers or mucosal atrophy.To correlate the histological characteristics of the H. pylori -induced gastritis to the immunoblot pattern of the H. pylori infection and to compare the presence of H. pylori bacteria in tissue specimens with ELISA serology and immunoblot analysis.One hundred and sixty-six consecutive patients were referred to gastroscopy. Forty patients were excluded for various reasons and 126 were included in the study.Twenty-three patients had ulcerations and 25 erosions. Ninety-two (73%) had a chronic gastritis and in 90 (71%) it involved both the antrum and corpus. Ninety-one (72%), of whom 96% had a chronic gastritis, had visible bacteria in the tissue specimens, used as the 'gold standard' for the detection of infection. In patients with chronic gastritis 65 (70%) had positive H. pylori ELISA serology, 27 (30%) had negative H. pylori ELISA, while 76 (83%) had a positive immunoblot pattern. The ELISA positive patients had more advanced chronic gastritis but a lower frequency of metaplasia and atrophy. Acute inflammatory activity in the chronic gastritis had a high immunoreactivity to 120 kDa (CagA) protein and was significantly correlated to antibody reactivity to proteins in the 53-65 kDa range (heat shock proteins) and to a 43 kDa subunit. Metaplasia and atrophy in antrum was associated with a 62 kDa protein band.Almost all H. pylori-infected patients had a pangastritis, visible in both antrum and corpus. Acute inflammatory activity in the chronic gastritis and the presence of metaplasia and atrophy in antrum were associated with a specific immunoblot pattern, indicating infection with more virulent strains. Immunoblot analysis had a better sensitivity than ELISA H. pylori serology.Detection of Helicobacter pylori infection.Role of noninvasive tests (C-urea breath test and stool antigen test) as additional tools in diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection in patients with atrophic body gastritis.Detection of Helicobacter pylori infection in atrophic body gastritis (ABG) is difficult, as during progression of body atrophy, H. pylori disappears.To increase the diagnostic yield of detection of active H. pylori infection in atrophic body gastritis patients by using noninvasive tests such as (13)C-Urea Breath Test ((13)C-UBT) and H. pylori stool antigen test (HpSA) would be useful.27 consecutive patients with newly-diagnosed atrophic body gastritis (19F/7M, age 27-73 years).Gastroscopy with biopsies (antrum n = 3, body n = 3) and histology according to updated Sydney system, H. pylori IgG serology, (13)C-UBT, and HpSA.All tests used in the diagnosis of H. pylori infection were in agreement in 9/27 atrophic body gastritis patients (33.3%), being all positive in four (14.8%) and all negative in five patients (18.5%). Ten of the 27 (37%) patients were Giemsa stain-positive and serology-positive (group I). Seventeen of the 27 (63%) patients were Giemsa stain-negative: 5/17 with positive serology (group II) and 12/17 with negative serology (group III). In group I, 5/10 (50%) were (13)C-UBT positive and 4/10 (40%) HpSA positive. In group II, two patients were (13)C-UBT positive, but all were HpSA negative. Also in group III, all patients were HpSA negative, but one had a positive (13)C-UBT.In atrophic body gastritis patients, neither (13)C-UBT nor HpSA per se add useful information regarding active H. pylori infection, but these noninvasive tests may be important in combination with histology and serology to define the H. pylori status in some atrophic body gastritis patients.[Insufficient validity of a rapid blood test for diagnosis of Helicobacter pylori infection].Rapid blood tests for diagnosis of Helicobacter (H.) pylori infection enable to detect antibodies against H. pylori instantly without laboratory equipment. Primary aim: to validate the Helisal Rapid Whole Blood Test (HRBT) with endoscopic bioptic methods as reference. Secondary aim: to compare the HRBT with ELISA IgG serology.The HRBT was performed in 145 consecutive dyspeptic patients (median age 59 years) before undergoing esophagogastroduodenoscopy including biopsies from gastric antrum and corpus. A positive H. pylori status was defined by a positive culture or the combination of a positive rapid urease test and a positive histology. Serum for ELISA IgG testing was available from 92 patients.The H. pylori status was positive in 66% of the patients. The sensitivity of the HRBT resulted at 80%, the specificity at 82%. The sensitivity of the HRBT for a positive ELISA test amounted to 87%, the specificity to 96%.The diagnostic validity of the HRBT is insufficient for clinical application. False test results add up by the general discrepancy between serological and bioptic methods and by diminished sensitivity compared to ELISA serology.